Connecticut, session 2026, SB00270.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Labor Commissioner shall
2 conduct a study of the Labor Department. Not later than January 1, 2027,
3 the commissioner shall report the results of the study, in accordance
4 with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint
5 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
6 matters relating to labor and public employees. Such report may include
7 the commissioner's recommendations for legislation regarding the
8 Labor Department.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
LAB Joint Favorable
SB270 / File No. 455 1

SB270 File No. 455
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Labor Commissioner to conduct a study
of the Labor Department, does not result in any fiscal impact to the state
or municipalities. The agency can accomplish this requirement without
the need for additional resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB270 / File No. 455 2

SB270 File No. 455
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 270
AN ACT CONCERNING THE LABOR DEPARTMENT.